Nebraska, session 109, LB911.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB911 LB911
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 38-4401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-4401 Sections 38-4401 to 38-4414 sections 2 to 4 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Behavior Analyst Practice Act.
Sec. 2. A licensed behavior analyst that supervises direct services
shall maintain a physical presence in the state through: (1) A primary
place of practice or residence; or (2) direct client contact or
supervision conducted within the state for a minimum of five percent of
the total direct service hours delivered per client per calendar month,
including no fewer than two in-person supervisory observations of
behavior technicians or equivalent staff during such period.
Sec. 3. (1) Remote-only clinical supervision is prohibited for any
applied behavior analysis treatment program providing more than fifteen
hours of direct services per client per week.
(2) Supervising clinicians shall:
(a) Hold an active license under the Behavior Analyst Practice Act;
(b) Conduct supervision in compliance with guidelines published by
the Behavior Analyst Certification Board, including a minimum of ten
percent observation of service hours; and
(c) Document at least one in-person observation of treatment
implementation and client progress per client per month.
Sec. 4. The board shall have authority to investigate complaints,
audit supervision records, and take disciplinary action against licensees
that violate the Behavior Analyst Practice Act.
Sec. 5. Section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-901 Sections 68-901 to 68-9,111 and section 6 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Medical Assistance Act.
Sec. 6. The department shall establish clinical review protocols
for applied behavior analysis services under the Behavior Analyst
Practice Act that exceed (1) twenty hours per week of direct service per
-2-

LB911 LB911
2026 2026
client or (2) twelve consecutive months of ongoing authorization without
documented functional progress to ensure continuing medical necessity and
prevent program overutilization.
Sec. 7. Section 71-1908, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-1908 (1) Sections 71-1908 to 71-1923.03 and section 8 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Child Care Licensing Act.
(2) The Legislature finds that there is a present and growing need
for quality child care programs and facilities. There is a need to
establish and maintain licensure of persons providing such programs to
ensure that such persons are competent and are using safe and adequate
facilities. The Legislature further finds and declares that the
development and supervision of programs are a matter of statewide concern
and should be dealt with uniformly on the state and local levels. There
is a need for cooperation among the various state and local agencies
which impose standards on licensees, and there should be one agency which
coordinates the enforcement of such standards and informs the Legislature
about cooperation among the various agencies.
Sec. 8. (1) No facility, practice, or service location shall be
required to obtain licensure as a child care program under the Child Care
Licensing Act solely on the basis that:
(a) It provides medically necessary applied behavior analysis;
(b) It serves clients younger than twenty years of age during
billable therapeutic sessions; and
(c) It does not provide custodial care or recreational supervision
outside the scope of a client's prescribed treatment plan.
(2) A facility, practice, or service location providing applied
behavior analysis shall be subject to the requirements of the Child Care
Licensing Act if it (a) offers or permits naps, meals, or nonclinical
recreational programming not associated with a treatment plan or (b)
retains one or more children onsite for more than ten cumulative hours
-3-

LB911 LB911
2026 2026
per week of nonbillable, nontherapeutic time per child.
(3) For purposes of this section, nontherapeutic time means any time
that is not (a) billable as medically necessary applied behavior analysis
under medicaid or private insurance or (b) used for required caregiver
training or active case supervision documented by a licensed behavior
analyst.
(4) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to specify when a dual licensing arrangement, waiver, or exemption is
necessary for applied behavior analysis programs that operate extended
day, summer, or wraparound care components.
Sec. 9. Original sections 38-4401 and 68-901, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and section 71-1908, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-4-